Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,276
Food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation regulation.

It is the responsibility of the department to regulate the operation of food establishments, food processing plants, and salvage operations in the manner set out in the Nebraska Pure Food Act.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.22;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 45;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 57.